test/src/dict-gt-yamls/A-cueaqkk_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - čueʹǩǩ class A1e: # Adjective 'shallow' - full paradigm
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Sg+Nom: čuẹʹǩǩ
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Pl+Nom: čuẹʹjj
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Attr: čuẹʹjjes
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Comp+Attr: čuẹʹjjab
    čueʹǩǩ+A+Superl+Attr: čuẹʹjjmõs
